ch.aff
FLAG             long    # two-character affix identifiers
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# First line gives MAP [number of mappings]
# After that are lines where MAP aå indicates these symbols are often confused  can be in parentheses, eg: (cc)(kk)
MAP 2
MAP aå
MAP nñ


#=======================================================================================================================
# [A0] <IN> INFIX
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX A0 Y 93
PFX A0 0 in [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 b bin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 d din [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 f fin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 g gin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 h hin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 k kin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 l lin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 m min [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 n nin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 p pin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 r rin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 s sin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 t tin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 y yin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 o ine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 u ini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 bl blin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 br brin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 ch chin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 dr drin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 fr frin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 gl glin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 gr grin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 kl klin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 kr krin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 ng ngin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 pl plin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 pr prin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 sk skin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 sl slin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 tr trin [^uo] <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 bo bine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 bu bini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 do dine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 du dini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 fo fine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 fu fini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 go gine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 gu gini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 ho hine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 hu hini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 ko kine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 ku kini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 lo line . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 lu lini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 mo mine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 mu mini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 no nine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 nu nini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 po pine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 pu pini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 ro rine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 ru rini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 so sine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 su sini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 to tine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 tu tini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 yo yine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 yu yini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 blo bline . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 blu blini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 bro brine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 bru brini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 cho chine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 chu chini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 dro drine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 dru drini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 fro frine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 fru frini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 glo gline . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 glu glini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 gro grine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 gru grini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 gui guini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 gua guina . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 gue guini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 klo kline . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 klu klini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 kro krine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 kru krini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 ngo ngine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 ngu ngini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 plo pline . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 plu plini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 pro prine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 pru prini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 sko skine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 sku skini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 slo sline . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 slu slini . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 tro trine . <in>_INFIX
PFX A0 tru trini . <in>_INFIX


#=======================================================================================================================
# [A1] <UM> INFIX
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX A1 Y 30
PFX A1 0 um . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 b bum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 d dum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 f fum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 g gum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 h hum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 k kum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 l lum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 m mum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 n num . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 p pum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 r rum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 s sum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 t tum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 y yum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 bl blum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 br brum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 ch chum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 dr drum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 fr frum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 gl glum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 gr grum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 kl klum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 kr krum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 ng ngum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 pl plum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 pr prum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 sk skum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 sl slum . <um>_INFIX
PFX A1 tr trum . <um>_INFIX


#=======================================================================================================================
# [A2] INITIAL REDUPLICATION  --- NEEDS UPDATING --- only first vowel
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX A2 Y 235
PFX A2 a a'a . NOM
PFX A2 e e'e . NOM
PFX A2 i i'i . NOM
PFX A2 o o'o . NOM
PFX A2 u u'u . NOM
PFX A2 bå båba . NOM
PFX A2 ba baba . NOM
PFX A2 bai baibai . NOM
PFX A2 bao baobao . NOM
PFX A2 be bebe . NOM
PFX A2 bi bibi . NOM
PFX A2 bie biebie . NOM
PFX A2 bio biobio . NOM
PFX A2 bo bobo . NOM
PFX A2 boi boiboi . NOM
PFX A2 bu bubu . NOM
PFX A2 bue buebue . NOM
PFX A2 blå blåbla . NOM
PFX A2 ble bleble . NOM
PFX A2 blu blublu . NOM
PFX A2 brå bråbra . NOM
PFX A2 brea breabrea . NOM
PFX A2 bre brebre . NOM
PFX A2 bri bribri . NOM
PFX A2 broa broabroa . NOM
PFX A2 bro brobro . NOM
PFX A2 bru brubru . NOM
PFX A2 cha chacha . NOM
PFX A2 chå chåcha . NOM
PFX A2 chao chaochao . NOM
PFX A2 che cheche . NOM
PFX A2 chi chichi . NOM
PFX A2 cho chocho . NOM
PFX A2 chu chuchu . NOM
PFX A2 dai daidai . NOM
PFX A2 da dada . NOM
PFX A2 då dåda . NOM
PFX A2 de dede . NOM
PFX A2 dei deidei . NOM
PFX A2 di didi . NOM
PFX A2 dia diadia . NOM
PFX A2 die diedie . NOM
PFX A2 dio diodio . NOM
PFX A2 do dodo . NOM
PFX A2 du dudu . NOM
PFX A2 due duedue . NOM
PFX A2 drai draidrai . NOM
PFX A2 dra dradra . NOM
PFX A2 dre dredre . NOM
PFX A2 fa fafa . NOM
PFX A2 få fåfa . NOM
PFX A2 fai faifai . NOM
PFX A2 fe fefe . NOM
PFX A2 fia fiafia . NOM
PFX A2 fie fiefie . NOM
PFX A2 fi fifi . NOM
PFX A2 fo fofo . NOM
PFX A2 fue fuefue . NOM
PFX A2 fu fufu . NOM
PFX A2 frå fråfra . NOM
PFX A2 fra frafra . NOM
PFX A2 fre frefre . NOM
PFX A2 fri frifri . NOM
PFX A2 fru frufru . NOM
PFX A2 ga gaga . NOM
PFX A2 gai gaigai . NOM
PFX A2 gao gaogao . NOM
PFX A2 gå gåga . NOM
PFX A2 ge gege . NOM
PFX A2 gi gigi . NOM
PFX A2 gia giagia . NOM
PFX A2 goia goiagoia . NOM
PFX A2 go gogo . NOM
PFX A2 gu gugu . NOM
PFX A2 gua guagua . NOM
PFX A2 gue guegue . NOM
PFX A2 gui guigui . NOM
PFX A2 glo gloglo . NOM
PFX A2 grå grågra . NOM
PFX A2 gri grigri . NOM
PFX A2 gru grugru . NOM
PFX A2 ha haha . NOM
PFX A2 hå håha . NOM
PFX A2 hai haihai . NOM
PFX A2 hao haohao . NOM
PFX A2 he hehe . NOM
PFX A2 hi hihi . NOM
PFX A2 hoe hoehoe . NOM
PFX A2 hou houhou . NOM
PFX A2 ho hoho . NOM
PFX A2 hu huhu . NOM
PFX A2 hue huehue . NOM
PFX A2 hui huihui . NOM
PFX A2 ka kaka . NOM
PFX A2 kai kaikai . NOM
PFX A2 kå kåka . NOM
PFX A2 kao kaokao . NOM
PFX A2 ke keke . NOM
PFX A2 keu keukeu . NOM
PFX A2 kie kiekie . NOM
PFX A2 kio kiokio . NOM
PFX A2 ki kiki . NOM
PFX A2 ko koko . NOM
PFX A2 ku kuku . NOM
PFX A2 kue kuekue . NOM
PFX A2 kui kuikui . NOM
PFX A2 kuo kuokuo . NOM
PFX A2 klå klåkla . NOM
PFX A2 kla klakla . NOM
PFX A2 kle klekle . NOM
PFX A2 kli klikli . NOM
PFX A2 kra krakra . NOM
PFX A2 kre krekre . NOM
PFX A2 kri krikri . NOM
PFX A2 kru krukru . NOM
PFX A2 krue kruekrue . NOM
PFX A2 la lala . NOM
PFX A2 lai lailai . NOM
PFX A2 lao laolao . NOM
PFX A2 lå låla . NOM
PFX A2 le lele . NOM
PFX A2 lia lialia . NOM
PFX A2 li lili . NOM
PFX A2 lie lielie . NOM
PFX A2 lio liolio . NOM
PFX A2 lo lolo . NOM
PFX A2 lu lulu . NOM
PFX A2 ma mama . NOM
PFX A2 må måma . NOM
PFX A2 mai maimai . NOM
PFX A2 mao maomao . NOM
PFX A2 mau maumau . NOM
PFX A2 me meme . NOM
PFX A2 mi mimi . NOM
PFX A2 mie miemie . NOM
PFX A2 mo momo . NOM
PFX A2 mu mumu . NOM
PFX A2 mue muemue . NOM
PFX A2 na nana . NOM
PFX A2 nå nåna . NOM
PFX A2 nai nainai . NOM
PFX A2 nao naonao . NOM
PFX A2 ne nene . NOM
PFX A2 ni nini . NOM
PFX A2 nie nienie . NOM
PFX A2 no nono . NOM
PFX A2 nu nunu . NOM
PFX A2 nue nuenue . NOM
PFX A2 ngai ngaingai . NOM
PFX A2 nga nganga . NOM
PFX A2 ngå ngånga . NOM
PFX A2 nge ngenge . NOM
PFX A2 ngi ngingi . NOM
PFX A2 ngo ngongo . NOM
PFX A2 ngu ngungu . NOM
PFX A2 pai paipai . NOM
PFX A2 på påpa . NOM
PFX A2 pao paopao . NOM
PFX A2 pa papa . NOM
PFX A2 pe pepe . NOM
PFX A2 pi pipi . NOM
PFX A2 pie piepie . NOM
PFX A2 pio piopio . NOM
PFX A2 po popo . NOM
PFX A2 pue puepue . NOM
PFX A2 pu pupu . NOM
PFX A2 plai plaiplai . NOM
PFX A2 plå plåpla . NOM
PFX A2 pla plapla . NOM
PFX A2 ple pleple . NOM
PFX A2 plie plieplie . NOM
PFX A2 pli plipli . NOM
PFX A2 plo ploplo . NOM
PFX A2 plu pluplu . NOM
PFX A2 pra prapra . NOM
PFX A2 pre prepre . NOM
PFX A2 pri pripri . NOM
PFX A2 proa proaproa . NOM
PFX A2 pro propro . NOM
PFX A2 prue prueprue . NOM
PFX A2 prui pruiprui . NOM
PFX A2 rai rairai . NOM
PFX A2 ra rara . NOM
PFX A2 re rere . NOM
PFX A2 reu reureu . NOM
PFX A2 ria riaria . NOM
PFX A2 rie rierie . NOM
PFX A2 riu riuriu . NOM
PFX A2 ri riri . NOM
PFX A2 ro roro . NOM
PFX A2 rue ruerue . NOM
PFX A2 rui ruirui . NOM
PFX A2 ru ruru . NOM
PFX A2 sa sasa . NOM
PFX A2 så såsa . NOM
PFX A2 sai saisai . NOM
PFX A2 sao saosao . NOM
PFX A2 se sese . NOM
PFX A2 si sisi . NOM
PFX A2 sie siesie . NOM
PFX A2 sio siosio . NOM
PFX A2 siu siusiu . NOM
PFX A2 so soso . NOM
PFX A2 su susu . NOM
PFX A2 sue suesue . NOM
PFX A2 sui suisui . NOM
PFX A2 ske skeske . NOM
PFX A2 skui skuiskui . NOM
PFX A2 slai slaislai . NOM
PFX A2 slu sluslu . NOM
PFX A2 ta tata . NOM
PFX A2 tå tåta . NOM
PFX A2 tai taitai . NOM
PFX A2 tao taotao . NOM
PFX A2 te tete . NOM
PFX A2 ti titi . NOM
PFX A2 tie tietie . NOM
PFX A2 tio tiotio . NOM
PFX A2 to toto . NOM
PFX A2 tu tutu . NOM
PFX A2 trai traitrai . NOM
PFX A2 trå tråtra . NOM
PFX A2 tre tretre . NOM
PFX A2 tria triatria . NOM
PFX A2 trie trietrie . NOM
PFX A2 tri tritri . NOM
PFX A2 tro trotro . NOM
PFX A2 tru trutru . NOM
PFX A2 ya yaya . NOM
PFX A2 yao yaoyao . NOM
PFX A2 yeo yeoyeo . NOM
PFX A2 ye yeye . NOM
PFX A2 yi yiyi . NOM
PFX A2 yo yoyo . NOM
PFX A2 yu yuyu . NOM


#=======================================================================================================================
# [A3] PREFIX - RECIPROCAL  á-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX A3 Y 3
PFX A3 0 á [^áaeiou] RECIP
PFX A3 0 á' [^á] RECIP
PFX A3 1 á'a [á] RECIP


#=======================================================================================================================
# [A4] PREFIX - SIMULTANEOUS  chá-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: 
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX A4 Y 3
PFX A4 0 chá [^áaeiou] SIMULT
PFX A4 0 chá' [^á] SIMULT
PFX A4 1 chá'a [á] SIMULT
